Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.260

Subpoenas—Witness fees.

The court shall have authority to subpoena witnesses as now authorized in superior courts throughout the state. Such witnesses shall be paid according to law with mileage as authorized for witnesses to such cases.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.20.260. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 26.]